District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

1-207.31

Services between United States government and District government.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 822, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 731
Sept. 13, 1982, 96 Stat. 1068, Pub. L. 97-258, § 5(b)

Cross References

District of Columbia administration, personnel management, reciprocal agreements for use of equipment, materials, facilities, and services, see § 1-628.01.

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.22, § 1-207.34, § 1-207.39, and § 1-628.01.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 1-1131, 1-1131.1.
1973 Ed., § 1-826.

Editor's Notes

This section is set out above to correct an error appearing in the bound volume.